Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2701
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 21-2701 to 21-2703, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Private corporation shall mean a corporation organized under Chapter 21, with a purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign trade zone;

(2) Public corporation shall mean this state; a political subdivision thereof; any municipality therein; any public agency of the state, of any political subdivision thereof, or of any municipality therein; or any other corporate instrumentality of this state, a political subdivision of this state or a municipality in this state; and

(3) Act of Congress shall mean the Act of Congress approved June 18, 1934, entitled An act to provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of foreign trade zones in ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce, and for other purposes, as amended, and commonly known as the Foreign Trade Zone Act of 1934.

Laws 1973, LB 387, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 21-20,145.